South Dakota, session 2026, SB126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-4-40 be AMENDED:
10-4-40. Two Three hundred thousand dollars of the full and true value of the
total amount of a dwelling, or portion thereof, classified as owner-occupied pursuant to
§§ 10-13-39 to 10-13-40.4, inclusive, that is owned and occupied by a veteran who is
rated as permanently and totally disabled from a service-connected disability, is exempt
from property taxation. The veteran shall apply for this partial exemption on a form
prescribed by the secretary of revenue the Department of Revenue. Any application or
supporting document for this exemption is confidential. Any A veteran who would
otherwise qualify for this exemption but fails to comply with the application deadline for
the owner-occupied classification or the deadline for application for this exemption may
petition the board of county commissioners to recalculate the taxes based upon the owner-
occupied classification and this exemption and abate or refund the difference in taxes
pursuant to chapter 10-18.
If the director of equalization determines that the veteran receives an exemption
for the veteran's dwelling pursuant to this section, the veteran retains that the exemption
until the property ownership is transferred, the veteran does not occupy the dwelling, or
the property has a change in use. If the legal description of property is changed or
amended and the veteran continues to reside in the dwelling, the veteran retains the
exemption provided by this section.
Section 2. That § 10-4-41 be AMENDED:
10-4-41. Two Three hundred thousand dollars of the full and true value of the
total amount of a dwelling, or portion thereof, classified as owner-occupied pursuant to
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.675.12 2 126
§§ 10-13-39 to 10-13-40.4, inclusive, is exempt from property taxation if owned and
occupied by:
(1) The surviving spouse of a veteran who was rated as permanently and totally
disabled from a service-connected disability; or
(2) The surviving spouse of a veteran, who receives dependency and indemnity
compensation from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a result of
the veteran's service-connected death.
The surviving spouse shall apply for this partial exemption on a form prescribed by
the secretary of revenue. Any the Department of Revenue. The application or and
supporting document for this exemption is confidential. Any A surviving spouse who would
otherwise qualify for this exemption but fails to comply with the application deadline for
the owner-occupied classification or the deadline for application for this exemption may
petition the board of county commissioners to recalculate the taxes based upon the owner-
occupied classification and this exemption and abate or refund the difference in taxes
pursuant to chapter 10-18.
If the director of equalization determines that the surviving spouse receives an
exemption for the dwelling pursuant to this section, the surviving spouse retains that the
exemption until the property ownership is transferred, the surviving spouse does not
occupy the dwelling, the surviving spouse remarries, or the property has a change in use.
If the legal description of property is changed or amended and the surviving spouse
continues to reside in the dwelling, the surviving spouse retains the exemption provided
by this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.